South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3172.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 46 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 46-3-290.  (A) Any food or food product carrying a "Certified SC Grown" designation may not contain messenger ribonucleic acid, known commonly as mRNA. The Department of Agriculture is required to have an applicant for a "Certified SC Grown" designation certify that its food or food product does not contain messenger ribonucleic acid. (B) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (A) by placing a "Certified SC Grown" designation on its food or food product containing mRNA, upon conviction, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars or must be imprisoned for not more than thirty days. Each violation constitutes a separate offense. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----